lexc/adj/enhuadjbator.lexc
! enhuadjbator.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [stem]  +Adj @U.ART.PRESENT@ 

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter +Mid
+Ik
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §oeoezmid§ §oeoez12§ §ooez13§ §EOA2§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoebb§
§oeoez11§ §OEOE11§ §oeoez1e§ §oeoez11e§
§OEOE4a§

LEXICON Root
   Prefleg ;

LEXICON Prefleg
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Adj ; ! optional article prefix
bátor Tocase;
bátor:bátr Tocase100;
                        Adj ; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Adj
bátor:bátr AddAdj10;


! al only with these
LEXICON AddAdj10
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase110;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!



LEXICON Tocase
[stem]+Adj:0     Poss;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Gen2;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Gen2;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Gen2;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Gen2;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Gen2;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Gen2;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Gen2;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Gen2;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                            Gen2;

LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen3;
                       Case2;

LEXICON Gen2
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case2;

! This is the secret to have bokor+Adj+Fam+Acc
LEXICON Gen3
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;  !This one!!!

LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig

LEXICON Case2
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
!+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig



LEXICON Tocase100
[stem]+Adj:0     Poss100;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plur100;

LEXICON Poss100
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;    ! ot, et, öt, t
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam100;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam100;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE1§   Fam100;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam100;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam100;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE1§k   Fam100;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE§im   Fam100;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE§id   Fam100;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE§i   Fam100;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE§ink   Fam100;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam100;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE§ik   Fam100;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                                  Gen100; !required

LEXICON Plur100
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k     Gen100;
!                            Gen100; !required
        
LEXICON Fam100
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen100;
                       Gen100;

LEXICON Gen100
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case100;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi       Case100;
                         Case100;
 
LEXICON Case100
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig

LEXICON Tocase110
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Poss110;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plur110;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Fam110;

LEXICON Poss110
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;    ! ot, et, öt, t
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam110;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam110;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam110;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam110;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam110;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam110;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam110;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam110;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam110;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam110;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam110;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam110;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                                  Gen110; !required

LEXICON Plur110
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k     Gen110;
!                            Gen110; !required
        
LEXICON Fam110
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen110;
                       Gen110;

LEXICON Gen110
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case110;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi       Case110;
                         Case110;
 
LEXICON Case110
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
						  Ik;

Lexicon Ik
+Ik:^ik     Possik;
+Ik:^ik     Plurik;
+Ik:^ik     Famik;
            #;

LEXICON Possik
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famik;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famik;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famik;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famik;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Famik;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§AE1§   Famik;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famik;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famik;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famik;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famik;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE1§k   Famik;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE§im   Famik;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famik;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE§id   Famik;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famik;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE§i   Famik;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famik;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE§ink   Famik;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famik;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famik;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famik;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE§ik   Famik;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famik;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famik;
LEXICON Plurik
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1e§k    Genik;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Genik;
                            Genik;

LEXICON Famik
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genik;
                       Genik;

LEXICON Genik
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseik;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseik;
                       Caseik;
  
LEXICON Caseik
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezmid§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
